Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Kinship2.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounKinship2Stem;

LEXICON NounKinship2Stem   

අගමැතිතුම NounKinship2;
අගවිනිසුරුතුම NounKinship2;
අග්‍රවිනිශ්චයකාරතුම  NounKinship2;        #correct in Foma
අදිකාරම්තුම NounKinship2;
අධ්‍යක්ෂතුම NounKinship2;
අධිපතිතුම NounKinship2;
ආචාර්යතුම NounKinship2;
ආණ්ඩුකාරතුම NounKinship2;
ආදිපාදතුම NounKinship2;
ඇදුරුතුම NounKinship2;
ඇමතිතුම NounKinship2; 
උතුම NounKinship2;
එතුම NounKinship2;
කථානායකතුම NounKinship2;
ගුරුතුම NounKinship2;
ජනරාල්තුම NounKinship2;
ජනාධිපතිතුම NounKinship2;
තුම NounKinship2;
නායකතුම NounKinship2;
පඬිතුම NounKinship2;
පියතුම NounKinship2;
පූජකතුම NounKinship2;
බිෂොප්තුම NounKinship2;
මන්ත්‍රීතුම NounKinship2;
මැතිතුම NounKinship2;
මුදලිතුම NounKinship2;
මෙතුම NounKinship2;
රජතුම NounKinship2;
විද්‍යාලයාධිතුම NounKinship2;
විනිශ්චයකාරතුම NounKinship2;
විපක්ෂනායකතුම NounKinship2;
හමුදාපතිතුම NounKinship2;


LEXICON NounKinship2

ා+N+RT: ා #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:ා #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:ා #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:ාත්  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:ාත්  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:ායි  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:ායි  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:ෙක් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:ෙකි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:ෙකුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:ෙකුත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ACC:න්ලා  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+NOM:ාලා  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+VOC:න්ලාණෙනි  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:න්ලාත්  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:ාලාත්  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:න්ලායි  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:ාලායි  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:ෙකු #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:ෙකුයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:ාට #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:ාටත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:ාටයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:ෙකුට #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:ෙකුටත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:ෙකුටයි #;
ා+N+RT+PL+DAT:න්ලාට #;
ා+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:න්ලාටත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:න්ලාටයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:ාගෙන් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:ාගෙනුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:ාගෙනි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:ෙකුගෙන් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:ෙකුගෙනුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:ෙකුගෙනි #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ABL:න්ලාගෙන් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:න්ලාගෙනුත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:න්ලාගෙනි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ාගේ #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ාගේත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ාගේයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ාගෙ #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ාගෙත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ාගෙයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:ෙකුගේ #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:ෙකුගේත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:ෙකුගේයි #;
ා+N+RT+PL+GEN:න්ලාගේ #;
ා+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:න්ලාගේත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:න්ලාගේයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+VOC:නි #;
